test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_laigu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - ákšu: # ok LAIGU
    ákšu+N+Sg+Nom:  ákšu
    ákšu+N+Sg+Gen:  áákšu
    ákšu+N+Sg+Acc:  áákšu
    ákšu+N+Sg+Ill:  áákšun
    ákšu+N+Sg+Loc:  áákšust
    ákšu+N+Sg+Com:  ákšoin
    ákšu+N+Sg+Abe:  áˊkšuttáá
    ákšu+N+Ess:  ákšun
    ákšu+N+Par:  ákšud
    ákšu+N+Pl+Nom:  áákšuh
    ákšu+N+Pl+Gen: [áákšui, áˊkšui]
    ákšu+N+Pl+Acc:  áákšuid
    ákšu+N+Pl+Ill:  ákšoid
    ákšu+N+Pl+Loc:  áákšuin
    ákšu+N+Pl+Com:  áˊkšuiguin
    ákšu+N+Pl+Abe:  áˊkšuittáá

  Noun - skálžu: # ok LAIGU
    skálžu+N+Sg+Nom:  skálžu
    skálžu+N+Sg+Gen:  skáálžu
    skálžu+N+Sg+Acc:  skáálžu
    skálžu+N+Sg+Ill:  skáálžun
    skálžu+N+Sg+Loc:  skáálžust
    skálžu+N+Sg+Com:  skálžoin
    skálžu+N+Sg+Abe:  skáˊlžuttáá
    skálžu+N+Ess:  skálžun
    skálžu+N+Par:  skálžud
    skálžu+N+Pl+Nom:  skáálžuh
    skálžu+N+Pl+Gen: [skáálžui, skálžui]
    skálžu+N+Pl+Acc:  skáálžuid
    skálžu+N+Pl+Ill:  skálžoid
    skálžu+N+Pl+Loc:  skáálžuin
    skálžu+N+Pl+Com:  skáˊlžuiguin
    skálžu+N+Pl+Abe:  skáˊlžuittáá
